Hawaii statutes.
[§634-13] Questions of law; submission to
supreme court. In all cases of interpleader proceedings where the question
is one of law and the facts are not in dispute, the judge shall be at liberty
at the judge's discretion to decide the question without directing an action or
issue, and (if the judge shall think it desirable) to order that a special case
be stated for the opinion of the supreme court, and the proceedings upon such
case shall (as nearly as may be) be the same as upon a submission to the court
according to law. [L 1876, c 33, §9; RL 1925, §2876; RL 1935, §4065; RL 1945,
§10047; RL 1955, §230-17; HRS §634-47; ren HRS §634-13; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Interpleader, see HRCP rule 22.

Case Notes

Did not apply to district courts under prior law. 6 H. 254.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next